West Virginia, session 2025, HB2516.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. DEFINITIONS; LIMITATIONS OF CHAPTER; GOALS FOR EDUCATION. §1. Repeal of section relating to Vision 2020. §18-1-4. Vision 2020: An Education Blueprint for Two Thousand Twenty. [Repealed]. ARTICLE 2. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-2-16. Establishment and operation of state camp and conference center; rental thereof; expenditures; gifts and donations; county court may erect and equip buildings. [Repealed]. §18-2-16a. Construction of buildings and recreational facilities at state camp and conference center; charges for use; financing by revenue bonds or notes permissible; trustee for holders of bonds or notes; contents of trust agreement. [Repealed]. §18-2-39. College and career readiness initiative. [Repealed]. ARTICLE 2A. ADOPTIONS OF TEXTBOOKS, INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS AND LEARNING TECHNOLOGIES. §18-2A-1. Definition; adoption groups; adoption schedule. [Repealed]. §18-2A-2. Request for samples and bids; deposit by bidder; selection, approval and publication of multiple list. [Repealed]. §18-2A-3. Disposition of and requests for samples. [Repealed]. §18-2A-4. Execution of contracts; bond. [Repealed]. §18-2A-5. Selection by county boards; school curriculum teams. [Repealed]. §18-2A-6. Retail prices; limitation on profit; violation; penalty. [Repealed]. §18-2A-7. Exchange privilege; use of supplementary items; state-approved depositories authorized. [Repealed]. §18-2A-8. Instructional resources must be approved and listed; when changes may be effected; rules. [Repealed]. ARTICLE 5B. SCHOOL INNOVATON ZONES ACT. §18-5B-1. Title. [Repealed]. §18-5B-2. Legislative findings and purpose. [Repealed]. §18-5B-3. School innovation zones; application for designation; state board rule. [Repealed]. §18-5B-4. Innovation zones; required plans; plan approval; state board rule. [Repealed]. §18-5B-5. Approval of innovation zone plans; waiver of statutes, policies, rules or interpretations. [Repealed]. §18-5B-6. Employee approval of innovation plan application and plan; transfer of employees. [Repealed]. §18-5B-7. Progress reviews and annual reports. [Repealed]. §18-5B-8. Teacher vacancies in an innovation zone; job postings exceeding certain qualifications and requirements; approval of postings. [Repealed]. §18-5B-9. Establishment of new innovation zone schools by state institutions of higher education. [Repealed]. §18-5B-10. Exceptions to statutes granted to innovation zones; limitations. [Repealed]. §18-5B-11. Local Solution Dropout Prevention and Recovery Innovation Zone Act. [Repealed]. §18-5B-12. School system collaborative innovation zone; requirements to qualify; application for designation; required plans for innovation zones; plan approval; waiver of statutes, policies, rules or interpretations; progress reviews and annual reports; teacher vacancies, job postings and approval. [Repealed]. §18-5B-13. Innovation school district Act; legislative findings, intent and purpose; eligibility; application; innovation plan and plan approval; designation; waiver of statutes, policies, rules or interpretations; exceptions; progress reviews and annual reports; state board rule. [Repealed]. §18-5B-14. Termination of funding for School Innovation Zones and Local Solution Dropout Prevention and Recovery Innovation Zones. [Repealed]. ARTICLE 10H.  ALBERT YANNI PROGRAMS OF EXCELLENCE IN VOCATIONAL-TECHNICAL EDUCATION. §18-10H-6. Effective schools program in vocational-technical education. [Repealed]. §18-10H-7. Unified technology transfer program. [Repealed].